North Carolina, session 2025, HB633.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of one million six hundred
seventy-eight thousand four hundred dollars ($1,678,400) in recurring funds and six hundred
twenty-nine thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars ($629,873) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year; and the sum of one million six hundred seventy-eight thousand four
hundred dollars ($1,678,400) in recurring funds and six hundred thirteen thousand two hundred
fifty dollars ($613,250) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and
used as follows:
(1) Funds for comprehensive sickle cell medical centers. – The sum of one million
three hundred sixteen thousand three hundred sixty-four dollars ($1,316,364)
in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be
distributed in the following amounts to the following comprehensive sickle
cell medical centers each fiscal year to support the multifaceted needs of
individuals with sickle cell disease, including social and behavioral health
services and assistance for young adults transitioning from pediatric to adult
care:
a. Atrium Health. – The sum of two hundred three thousand seven
hundred thirteen dollars ($203,713).
b. Duke University Medical Center. – The sum of two hundred forty-four
thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($244,999).
*H633-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. East Carolina University School of Medicine. – The sum of two
hundred thirty-five thousand five hundred thirty-six dollars
($235,536).
d. Mission Hospitals. – The sum of one hundred thirty-seven thousand
six hundred one dollars ($137,601).
e. The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill School of Medicine.
– The sum of two hundred eighty-one thousand thirty-one dollars
($281,031).
f. Wake Forest University Baptist Medical Center. – The sum of two
hundred thirteen thousand four hundred eighty-four dollars
($213,484).
(2) Funds for one Transition Coordinator position at each comprehensive sickle
cell medical center. – Of the funds allocated in subdivision (1) of this section,
the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used by each comprehensive
sickle cell medical center to create one full-time, permanent Transition
Coordinator position at each medical center to conduct transition readiness
assessments and other coordination activities to ensure a seamless referral
process for individuals with sickle cell disease who are transitioning from
pediatric to adult care.
(3) Funds to provide directed grants to community-based organizations. – The
sum of three hundred fifty-three thousand two hundred fifty dollars
($353,250) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to award grants to one or more nonprofit corporations to provide
services to individuals with sickle cell disease. In selecting grantees, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall
prioritize community-based, nonprofit organizations that provide a
comprehensive array of services to individuals with sickle cell disease, their
families, and the surrounding community in counties that are lacking these
services. Each grantee shall use a portion of their grant award to facilitate the
transition of individuals with sickle cell disease from pediatric to adult care at
the local level.
(4) Funds to support North Carolina Sickle Cell Syndrome Program operations. –
The following amounts to the Women, Infant and Community Wellness
Section of the Division of Public Health within the Department of Health and
Human Services to support the operations of the North Carolina Sickle Cell
Syndrome Program authorized by G.S. 130A-129:
a. The sum of three hundred sixty-two thousand thirty-six dollars
($362,036) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to create additional full-time, permanent positions to support
the work of the North Carolina Sickle Cell Syndrome Program.
b. The sum of sixteen thousand six hundred twenty-three dollars
($16,623) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
purchase office equipment and furniture to support any positions
created under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.
c. The sum of two hundred sixty thousand dollars ($260,000) in
nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
disseminate an evidence-based sickle cell disease toolkit to emergency
department providers throughout the State and to facilitate their
implementation of the toolkit in order to improve emergency
department care for patients with sickle cell disease.
Page 2 House Bill 633-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 633-First Edition Page 3